Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
Sections 2 and 3 of this  2026 Act are added to and made a part of ORS
chapter 183.
SECTION 2. (1) This section applies to the following agencies:
(a) The Department of Environmental Quality.
(b) The Department of State Lands.
(c) The State Department of Energy.
(d) The State Department of Geology and Mineral Industries.
(2) When an agency listed in subsection (1) of  this section denies an application for a
permit, as defined in ORS 183.700, the agency shall specify the  statutory or regulatory au-
thority justifying the denial and provide the applicant a  guide on how to contest the denial
and the applicable time limitations for contesting the denial.
SECTION 3.
(1) This section applies to the following agencies:
(a) The Department of Environmental Quality.
(b) The Department of State Lands.
(c) The State Department of Energy.
(d) The State Department of Geology and Mineral Industries.
(2) No later than July 1,  2029, an agency listed in subsection (1) of this section shall de-
velop or identify a performance measure as provided in  ORS 291.110 that measures the
timeliness of processing and issuance of permits and renewals of permits. The performance
measure must be accompanied by a description of what slows processing and  issuance or
renewal of permits and what steps in the processing of permits take the most time. The
performance measure may be accompanied by suggestions for statutory and other  changes
that could accelerate the timelines.
Enrolled House Bill 4020 (HB 4020-B) Page 1
(3) On or after July 1,  2039, an agency may reevaluate the usefulness of the performance
measure required by  subsection (2) of this section and may discontinue using the perform-
ance measure.
SECTION 4. Section 3 of this 2026 Act is repealed on January 2, 2040.
SECTION 5. This 2026 Act takes effect on the 91st day after the date  on which the 2026
regular session of the Eighty-third Legislative Assembly adjourns sine die.
Passed by House March 3, 2026
..................................................................................
Timothy G. Sekerak, Chief Clerk of House
..................................................................................
Julie Fahey, Speaker of House
Passed by Senate March 5, 2026
..................................................................................
Rob Wagner, President of Senate
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2026
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2026
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2026
..................................................................................
Tobias Read, Secretary of State
Enrolled House Bill 4020 (HB 4020-B) Page 2